Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2379.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Trauma-Informed Maternity Care Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified registered nurse anesthetist." As defined in section 2 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law."Certified registered nurse practitioner." As defined in section 2 of The Professional Nursing Law."Clinical nurse specialist." As defined in section 2 of The 123456789101112131415161718 Professional Nursing Law."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Genetic counselor." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Licensed clinical social worker." As defined in section 3 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Licensed practical nurse." An individual licensed to practice practical nursing under the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1211, No.376), known as the Practical Nurse Law."Licensed professional counselor." As defined in section 3 of the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Licensed social worker." As defined in section 3 of the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Licensing board." A licensing board under the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs in the Department of State with jurisdiction over maternity care providers."Maternity care provider." Any of the following individuals who provide care during pregnancy, childbirth or the postpartum period as determined by the appropriate licensing board:(1) Genetic counselor.(2) Licensed professional counselor.(3) Midwife.(4) Nurse.(5) Physician.(6) Physician assistant.20260HB2379PN3182 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Psychologist.(8) Social worker."Midwife." An individual licensed to practice midwifery under the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Nurse." A certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified registered nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, licensed practical nurse or registered nurse."Physician." As defined under the following:(1) Section 2 of the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(2) Section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act."Physician assistant." As defined in section 2 of the Medical Practice Act of 1985 or section 2 of the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act."Postpartum period." A period of up to one year after childbirth."Psychologist." An individual licensed to practice psychology under the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act."Registered nurse." An individual licensed to practice professional nursing under The Professional Nursing Law."Social worker." A licensed social worker or licensed clinical social worker."Trauma-informed care." A framework of clinical practice that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Recognizes the prevalence and impact of trauma.(2) Resists retraumatization by avoiding practices or policies that could perpetuate or worsen trauma and by establishing a safe and supportive environment.(3) Emphasizes physical and emotional safety, trust, 20260HB2379PN3182 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transparency, peer support, collaboration and empowerment.(4) Promotes safety, empowerment and healing in response to cultural, historical and gender-based inequities.Section 3. Trauma-informed care education.(a) Continuing education requirement.--Each licensing board shall require a maternity care provider who applies to renew a license to complete at least four hours of continuing education in trauma-informed care as part of the total continuing education required for license renewal.(b) Approval of curricula.--Within 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, each licensing board, in consultation with the department, shall approve the curricula for the trauma-informed care education required under subsection (a).Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 3(a) shall take effect in one year.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2379PN3182 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920